New York, session 2025-2026, S9981.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law is amended 2 by adding two new paragraphs 47 and 48 to read as follows: 3 (47) Pet food to include kibble, dry food, wet food, toppers, fresh, 4 frozen and freeze-dried food. For the purposes of this subdivision, 5 "pet" shall have the same meaning as such term is defined in subdivision 6 eight of section one hundred twenty-eight of the agriculture and markets 7 law. 8 (48) Specialty pet food which shall include any commercial feed 9 prepared and distributed for consumption by specialty pets. For the 10 purposes of this subdivision, "specialty pet" shall have the same mean- 11 ing as such term is defined in subdivision ten of section one hundred 12 twenty-eight of the agriculture and markets law. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14896-01-6